Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General

§ 33-24-101.
Short title; definitions.

This act means W.S.

33-24-101

through

33-24-301

and shall be known as the “Wyoming Pharmacy Act”.

As used in this act:

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 7, § 2.

“Telepharmacy” means a site where prescription drugs are stored and dispensed that is remote from but under the active control and supervision of a parent pharmacy and a licensed pharmacist and that is subject to the requirements of W.S.

33-24-156

;

“Collaborative pharmaceutical care” means a pharmacist working in collaboration with practitioners authorized to prescribe medications;

“Unprofessional conduct” means:

Dispensing a drug or brand of drug in filling a prescription which differs from that specified by the prescription, without authority of the issuer of the prescription, regarding the patient’s name, drug, strength, quantity, directions or number of authorized refills;

Obtaining any fee by fraud or misrepresentation;

Willfully betraying patient confidences, provided a pharmacist may provide otherwise confidential patient information to other licensed health care professionals treating the patient;

Employing directly or indirectly any student, any unlicensed pharmacy technician or any unlicensed pharmacist to practice pharmacy unless authorized by this act;

Advertising in a misleading, false or deceptive manner;

Filling a prescription which is more than two (2) years old;

Filling a prescription without reasonable inquiry and confirmation of its validity if there are reasonable grounds to doubt the current existence of a practitioner-patient relationship between the practitioner and the customer seeking to obtain the drug;

Filling a prescription with a drug that is past the expiration date provided by the manufacturer or supplier of the drug or other competent authority;

Filling a prescription with drugs which have not been refrigerated as recommended by the manufacturer or supplier of the drugs or by other competent authority; or

Other actions defined by rule and regulations as relevant to the pharmacist’s professional character.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-305; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.1; Laws 1989, ch. 85, § 2; ch. 250, § 2; 1995, ch. 23, § 1; 1997, ch. 100, § 1; 1999, ch. 101, § 2; 2001, ch. 54, § 1; 2005, ch. 192, § 2; 2007, ch. 211, § 1; 2017 ch. 124, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote former (a) and (b) as (a), redesignating former (c) as (b); added present (b)(i) and (ii), and redesignated former (d) as (b)(iii); and designated the definition of “unprofessional conduct” as (b)(iv), redesignating former (i) through (x) as (b)(iv)(A) through (b)(iv)(K).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b)(iv)(A) inserted “, regarding the patient's name, drug, strength, quantity, directions or number of authorized refills” at the end of the sentence; in (b)(iv)(D) inserted “, any unlicensed pharmacy technician” following “indirectly any student” and substituted “this act” for “law” at the end of the sentence.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 124, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (b)(ii), rewrote the definition of “Telepharmacy” which formerly read: ““Telepharmacy” means a site located within a medical clinic or community health center that is remote from but under the active control and supervision of a licensed pharmacist, and that is staffed during hours of operation by a certified pharmacy technician or registered pharmacy intern.”

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (b)(iii) substituted “practitioners” for “physicians and other medical providers,” in (b)(iv)(G) substituted “practitioner-patient” for “doctor-patient,” and “practitioner” for “prescriber”.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, repealed former (b)(i), which read, “‘Direct supervision’ means that a licensed pharmacist shall be physically present and capable of observing the actions of a pharmacy technician except at telepharmacies where video oversight is maintained.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (b)(iv)(I) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal liability of pharmacy or pharmacist for welfare fraud in connection with supplying prescription drugs, 16 ALR5th 390.

Civil liability of pharmacist or druggists for failure to warn of potential drug interactions in use of prescription drug, 79 ALR5th 409.

§ 33-24-102.
State board of pharmacy; generally.

There is created a state board of pharmacy whose duty is to carry out the purposes and to enforce the provisions of this act. The board shall consist of nine (9) voting members consisting of five (5) pharmacists, one (1) physician, one (1) dentist or veterinarian, one (1) member of the public and one (1) pharmacy technician, who shall be appointed by the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate.

The term for board members shall be six (6) years, and shall expire on March 1. Each member, unless removed, shall serve until his successor is appointed and qualified. Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

The board shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the purposes and enforce the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 3; 1957, ch. 247, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-307; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.2; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1989, ch. 250, § 2; 2007, ch. 211, § 1; 2015 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “seven (7)” for “three (3)” following “board shall consist of”, inserted “consisting of four (4) pharmacists, one (1) physician, one (1) dentist or veterinarian and one (1) member of the public” following “voting members”, substituted “one (1)” for “three (3)” preceding “ex officio”, substituted “pharmacy technician” for “members” preceding “who shall be appointed by”, deleted the fifth and seventh sentences and substituted “member” for “members” preceding “shall have no vote and.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “nine (9)” for “seven (7)”, “five (5)” for “four (4)”, deleted the last three sentences which read “Members of the now existing board of pharmacy shall continue in office as voting members as if regularly appointed under this act. Their terms shall expire in accordance with their original appointments and be filled in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

28-12-101

. The ex officio member shall have no vote and shall have no part of licensing procedures or license suspension or revocation actions.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-103.
State board of pharmacy; qualifications of members; limitation on terms; prohibited affiliations.

A pharmacist who is currently licensed as provided in this article and actively engaged in the practice of pharmacy in Wyoming shall be eligible to be a voting member of the board of pharmacy if the pharmacist is a United States citizen and resident of Wyoming and at the time of appointment has been legally qualified to practice and engaged in the active practice of pharmacy in the state continuously for at least five (5) years.

A dentist, physician or veterinarian who is currently licensed pursuant to chapter 15, 25 or 30 of this title shall be eligible to be a voting member of the board of pharmacy if the dentist, physician or veterinarian is a United States citizen and resident of Wyoming and at the time of appointment has been licensed to practice and engaged in the active practice of dentistry, medicine or veterinary medicine in this state continuously for at least five (5) years.

A person shall be eligible for appointment as a voting member of the board representing the public if at the time of appointment the person is a United States citizen and resident of Wyoming and at the time of appointment has resided in this state continuously for at least five (5) years.

A pharmacy technician licensed pursuant to article 3 of this chapter and actively practicing as a pharmacy technician in Wyoming shall be eligible to be a voting member of the board if the person is a United States citizen and a resident of this state and at the time of appointment has been employed as a pharmacy technician in Wyoming continuously for at least five (5) years.

No member shall be appointed to, or serve, more than two (2) successive terms.

No member shall be connected with a school or college of pharmacy in a professional or executive capacity.

The term of any person appointed to the board pursuant to subsections (a) through (d) of this section shall expire immediately if the person no longer meets the eligibility criteria specified in the subsection under which the person was appointed.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 3; 1957, ch. 247, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-307; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.3; 2007, ch. 211, § 1; 2015 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (d), substituted “a voting” or “an ex officio.”

§ 33-24-104.
State board of pharmacy; vacancies.

Any vacancy upon the board caused by the disqualification, resignation, death or removal of a member shall be filled by the governor by appointment for the unexpired term of the vacated position. Appointment to fill a vacancy shall be made within ninety (90) days after the occurrence of the vacancy.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 3; 1957, ch. 247, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-307; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 4; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.4.

§ 33-24-105.
State board of pharmacy; oath or affirmation of members.

Each member of the board hereinafter appointed shall, before entering upon the duties of his office, take and subscribe an oath or affirmation that the member will support the constitution and the laws of the United States and the state of Wyoming, and that the member will faithfully perform the duties as a member of the state board of pharmacy.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 3; 1957, ch. 247, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-307; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 5; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.5; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, deleted “examiners of the state” at the end.

§ 33-24-106.
State board of pharmacy; president, vice-president and secretary-treasurer; common seal; meetings; quorum.

The board shall elect from its members a president, vice-president, and a secretary-treasurer. The board shall have a common seal. The board shall meet at least three (3) times a year, and more often if necessary, for the examination of applicants for registration and other business of the board at the times and places as shall be designated by the president or the board. Meetings of the board shall be at the call of the president and the secretary-treasurer or a majority of the board. A regular meeting of the board shall be held in the month of June of each year. A majority of the board shall at all times constitute a quorum, and the proceedings thereof shall at all reasonable times be open to public inspection.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 3; 1957, ch. 247, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-307; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 6; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.6.

§ 33-24-107.
State board of pharmacy; removal of members.

The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 3; 1957, ch. 247, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-307; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 7; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.7; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 33-24-108.
State board of pharmacy; creation of indebtedness; compensation of members; employment and compensation of staff; legal counsel.

The board of pharmacy shall not create any indebtedness on behalf of the state except as provided in this section.

Out of the fees collected and funds assessed by the board, each of the members of the board shall receive salary in the same manner and amount as members of the Wyoming legislature for each full or partial day actually engaged in the duties of his office and shall be reimbursed for per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii). Per diem and mileage expenses shall be paid from the board’s account.

The board may employ inspectors, chemists, agents, clerical help and other staff and personnel it determines necessary and may determine their salaries. All employees shall be reimbursed for per diem and mileage expenses as provided for state employees.

The board may engage the services of legal counsel with the approval of the attorney general, to be paid from funds collected under this act.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 3; 1957, ch. 247, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-307; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 8; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.8; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1981, ch. 105, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to per diem and traveling expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to amount of mileage fee or mileage expense to state, county or precinct officer or employee, see §

9-3-103

.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (b), substituted “in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “for employees of the state” in the first sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “salary in the same manner and amount as members of the Wyoming legislature” for “compensation at the rate of fifty dollars ($50.00)” and inserted “or partial.”

§ 33-24-109.
Disposition of moneys received and collected.

All monies shall be received and collected as provided by law. The state treasurer shall place the money in a separate account. The money shall only be paid out upon a lawful voucher properly accompanied by two (2) signatures authorized by the board showing that the expense has been actually and properly incurred in the performance of the duties devolved upon the board. Upon presentation of the voucher and certificate, the auditor shall draw his warrant upon the treasurer against the account in favor of the proper person. No warrant shall be drawn unless and until there are sufficient monies in the account to pay the same. The account shall only be drawn upon to pay the necessary compensation and expenses of the board, and such expenses as may be necessary to carry out and execute the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 3; 1957, ch. 247, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-307; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 10; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.10; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1989, ch. 250, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account. within the earmarked revenue fund” and made a related change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-24-110.
Administration of oaths.

The presiding officer of the board and the secretary are empowered to administer oaths in connection with investigations by and the duties of the board.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 3; 1957, ch. 247, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-307; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 11; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.11.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

§ 33-24-111.
Report to governor.

The board shall, as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

, report to the governor relative to its proceedings.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.12; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1.

§ 33-24-112.
Fees for examinations, reexaminations, license renewals and registration renewals; late fees.

The board shall determine each year the fees to be collected for examinations, reexaminations, license renewals and registration renewals based upon annual normal operating expenses, including late fees to be collected for failure to pay a license or renewal fee by the deadline established by the board, provided that:

Examination and reexamination fees shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) plus the amount charged by the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy to take the examinations;

License and registration renewals shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00);

Pharmacy licenses and renewals shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00);

Licenses and renewals for manufacturers or distributors of oxygen shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00);

Late fees for licenses and renewals shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300.00); and

Drug distributor licenses and renewals shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 42, § 2.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 33-308; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 13; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.13; Laws 1973, ch. 140, § 1; 1981, ch. 105, § 1; 1985, ch. 3, § 1; 1996, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 101, § 2; 2001, ch. 54, § 1; 2007, ch. 211, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iv) substituted “Licenses” for “Pharmacy licenses” at the beginning of the first sentence; added (a)(vi).

§ 33-24-113.
Licensing of resident pharmacy; exceptions; display of license; suspension, revocation, letter of admonition, administrative penalty or refusal to renew; appeals.

Any pharmacy located in this state which dispenses, mails or in any manner delivers controlled substances or prescription drugs or devices in this state pursuant to a prescription or provides pharmaceutical care in this state shall:

Submit a license application to the board on a form prescribed by the board and pay the license fee established by the board in its rules and regulations. Where pharmaceutical operations are conducted at more than one (1) location, each location shall be separately licensed;

Notify the board of the occurrence of any of the following:

Permanent closing of the pharmacy;

Change in pharmacy ownership, name, management, location or pharmacist in charge;

Conviction of any pharmacy owner or employee for violation of any state or federal drug law;

Any substantial theft or loss of dangerous drugs, controlled substances or medical devices;

Any other matter required to be reported by rule and regulation of the board.

The license shall be displayed in a conspicuous place in the pharmacy for which it is issued, and shall be renewed annually on or before June 30 by submitting a renewal application to the board.

It is unlawful for any person or commercial operation to operate a pharmacy unless a license has been issued to the operator by the board of pharmacy.

The board may deny, suspend, revoke or refuse to renew a license issued under this section, may issue a letter of admonition to a resident pharmacy licensee and may assess an administrative penalty, not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) per violation, against a resident pharmacy licensee on any of the following grounds:

Failure to comply with any requirement of this chapter or the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act;

Failure to comply with rules and regulations of the board;

Conviction of a pharmacy owner, pharmacist in charge, staff pharmacist or pharmacy technician for a felony under any state or federal law, if the conviction is related to the practice of pharmacy;

Obtaining any remuneration by fraud, misrepresentation or deception;

Suspension or revocation of a pharmacy license or any other disciplinary action against the licensee by a board of pharmacy in any other state;

Knowing submission of false, misleading or fraudulent information to the board in connection with an initial or renewal application for a resident pharmacy license;

Purchase or receipt of a prescription drug, controlled substance or medical device from a source other than a manufacturer, wholesaler or pharmacy licensed by the board;

Purchase or receipt of a prescription drug, controlled substance or medical device that is not approved by the federal food and drug administration;

Keeping the pharmacy open for business without a licensed pharmacist in charge on site;

Allowing a person who is not licensed by the board to perform duties as a pharmacist, pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician in training.

Before any final adverse administrative action is taken against a pharmacy licensee, the licensee is entitled to a hearing by the board of pharmacy upon due notice of the time and place where the hearing will be held. The accused may be represented by legal counsel, is entitled to compulsory attendance of witnesses and may appeal to the district court of the county in which the pharmacy is situated, in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Any administrative penalty assessed shall be paid to the board who shall remit the monies to the county treasurer to the credit of the public school fund of the county in which the violation occurred.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.14; Laws 1973, ch. 140, § 1; 1999, ch. 101, § 2; 2003, ch. 176, § 2; 2005, ch. 215, § 1; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, restructuring former (a) as (a) introductory paragraph and (a)(i) and (a)(ii), and restructuring former (b) as (b) through (f); expounding on requirements for licensing for resident and nonresident pharmacies; providing requirements for notice of operation by licensees to the board of pharmacy; expounding on grounds for denial, suspension, revocation or nonrenewal of licenses; and specifying procedures for appeals.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017,
in (a) substituted “prescription drugs” for “dangerous drugs” throughout the section, in (d)(v) added “or any other disciplinary action against the licensee by a board of pharmacy,” (d)(v) substituted “federal food and drug administration” for “federal drug administration”; and made a stylistic change.

Wyoming Controlled Substances Act. —

See §

35-7-1001

et seq.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 33-24-114.
Required pharmacy facilities, utensils and drugs.

To secure and retain a license, a pharmacy shall be equipped with facilities, apparatus, utensils and stock of drugs and medicines sufficient to permit the prompt and efficient compounding of prescriptions and shall be maintained in a sanitary and orderly manner. The minimum facilities, apparatus, utensils and stock of drugs and medicines shall be prescribed by the board of pharmacy.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 33-318; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 15; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.15; Laws 1973, ch. 140, § 1; 1993, ch. 30, § 2.

§ 33-24-115.
Unlawful sale of licenses.

It shall be unlawful for any member or members of the state board of pharmacy to sell or offer for sale any license contrary to the provisions of this act. A conviction thereof will constitute an abuse of official power and render such member ineligible for continued membership on the board and create a vacancy in his position.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.16.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

§ 33-24-116.
Qualifications of applicants for licensure as a pharmacist by examination.

Any person seeking licensure by examination to practice pharmacy in this state may make application in writing to the board. The applicant shall:

Submit an application in the form and containing information as prescribed by the board;

Have attained the age of majority;

Be possessed of a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of pharmacy or to the ability to practice pharmacy;

Have graduated and received a professional degree from a college or school of pharmacy that has been approved by the board or have graduated from a foreign college of pharmacy. Graduates from a foreign college of pharmacy shall have completed a transcript verification program, taken and passed a college of pharmacy equivalency exam and completed a communication ability test as provided in board regulations;

Have completed an internship or other program that has been approved by the board or demonstrated to the board’s satisfaction experience in the practice of pharmacy which meets or exceeds the minimum internship requirements specified in board regulations;

Have successfully passed an examination or examinations approved by the board;

Pay the fees specified in board regulations for the examination and any related materials;

Provide the board with fingerprints, necessary fees and other information required to perform a criminal history record background check as provided for by W.S.

7-19-201

. The board may delay issuing a license pending its receipt of the information from the background check.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 33-308; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 17; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.17; Laws 1973, ch. 140, § 1; ch. 213, § 2; 1991, ch. 112, § 1; 2003, ch. 176, § 2; 2007, ch. 211, § 1; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(iv) substituted “a professional degree” for “the first undergraduate degree.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, rewrote (a)(iii), which read: “Be of good moral character.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-24-117.
Examination required.

The applicant shall pass an examination, which has been adopted by the board, in a manner satisfactory to a reasonable board. The examination shall be, so far as the board shall deem practicable, on such subjects as are prescribed in the curriculum and taught in the accredited colleges and universities which offer courses of study leading to the degree above described and required, on the ethical and practical aspects of the practice of pharmacy which will confront a successful applicant in the practice of the profession in Wyoming, and on the laws and rules relating thereto. The examination shall be offered in the manner prescribed by the board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.18; 2015 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “a written and practical” and made related changes, deleted “written” in the second sentence, and “practical” in the third sentence, substituted “offered” for “held at a place designated by the board”, substituted “the board” for “it.”

§ 33-24-118.
Registration of applicant; issuance of license; contents of license or certificate of registration.

Upon an applicant passing the examination the board shall cause his name and residence to be registered in a record kept by it for that purpose; and if the application is complete and there are no known grounds for denial of the license requested, the board shall issue to the applicant a license as evidence of his eligibility to practice pharmacy. The license, or certificate of registration shall contain, along with the other advisory information, the name of the person to whom issued, the date of issuance, and a special registration number designed by the board for exclusive identification of the registrant.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.19; 2015 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “examination” for “written and practical examinations”, “record” for “book”, inserted “if the application is complete and there are no known grounds for denial of the license requested, the board.”

§ 33-24-119.
Reexamination fees; no refund of fees; notice of results of examination; application for reexamination.

All reexamination fees shall be the same as the current fee for the initial examination to be paid to the board. Before such examination is had, the fee must be paid, and in no case shall the examination or reexamination fee be refunded.

The applicant shall be informed within a reasonable time if he passed or failed to pass the examination.

An applicant who fails in his examination shall have the privilege, if he so desires, of applying to the board for a reexamination. This application shall be made in writing and shall be accompanied with the proper fee.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.20; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a) deleted “secretary of the” preceding “board”; in (b) deleted the second sentence, which formerly read: “A notification as aforesaid shall be made by mail to the address furnished therefor by applicant in this application”; in (c) deleted “at the next scheduled examination meeting” from the end of the first sentence.

§ 33-24-120.
Records as prima facie evidence.

The board shall keep a record in which shall be recorded the names and addresses and pertinent information of all applicants and such other matters as shall afford a full record of its activities; the records or transcripts therefrom, duly certified by the board, shall be prima facie evidence before all the courts of this state of the entries therein contained.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 3; 1957, ch. 247, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-307; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 21; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.21; 2015 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “book” preceding “in which shall” and “with the seal of the board attached” preceding “shall be prima facie.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, deleted “secretary of the” preceding “board”.

§ 33-24-121.
Renewal license certificate; late fee; expiration upon failure to renew; reinstatement; continuing professional education requirement for renewal; reduction or exception determined by board.

On or before December 31 of each year, any pharmacist licensed to practice pharmacy in this state shall transmit to the board his signature, registration number and address together with proof of compliance with subsection (d) of this section, the annual fee determined by the board and the relevant information pertaining to criminal, substance abuse, professional liability and licensure history. Upon receipt and compliance with all requirements, the board shall issue a renewal license certificate.

A late fee as provided by W.S. 33-24-112(a)(v) shall be charged to any licensee failing to renew his license by December 31.

If the licensee fails to secure the renewal certificate before December 31, the license to practice expires ten (10) days after mailing of written notice to renew sent to the holder by certified mail to the address last recorded for the licensee with the board. An expired license may be restored by the board upon compliance with this section not later than March 31 following expiration of the license.

The board may require that any person applying for renewal in accordance with subsection (a) of this section shall satisfactorily complete not less than six (6) nor more than fifteen (15) contact hours or not less than three-fifths (3/5) of one (1) continuing education unit nor more than one and one-half (1 1/2) continuing education units of approved continuing pharmaceutical education courses each year. For purposes of this subsection, one (1) continuing education unit is equivalent to ten (10) contact hours. No hours or units used for one (1) year shall apply to any other year. The board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer this subsection and may reduce or make exception to the requirements of this subsection for the initial year of application and for emergency or hardship cases. The board shall require one and one-half (1 1/2) hours of continuing education related to the responsible prescribing of controlled substances annually. The board may require a person licensed as an inactive pharmacist, who seeks to be licensed as an active pharmacist, to:

Provide proof of meeting the continuing education requirements for each year the person was licensed as an inactive pharmacist; or

Complete the continuing education requirements for each year, up to a maximum of five (5) years, the person was licensed as an inactive pharmacist.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 33-304.22; Laws 1981, ch. 105, § 1; 1993, ch. 30, § 2; 1999, ch. 101, § 2; 2001, ch. 54, § 1; 2003, ch. 176, § 2; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), deleted “secretary of the” preceding “board” near the beginning, and deleted “secretary” preceding “board” near the end; in (c) deleted
“return receipt requested” following “certified mail” and deleted “secretary” preceding “board”; in (d) deleted the former third sentence, which read: “The board may allow hours completed in one (1) year to be credited to another year;” and made two related changes.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (d), added the fourth sentence.

§ 33-24-122.
Revocation or suspension of license and registration; letter of admonition; summary suspension; administrative penalties; probation; grounds.

The license and registration of any pharmacist may be revoked or suspended by the board of pharmacy or the board may issue a letter of admonition, refuse to issue or renew any license or require successful completion of a rehabilitation program or issue a summary suspension for any of the following causes:

Conviction of a felony or high misdemeanor that relates to the practice of pharmacy or to the ability to practice pharmacy, in which case the record of conviction or a copy thereof certified by the clerk or judge of the court in which the conviction is had shall be conclusive evidence;

For renting or loaning to any person his or her license or diploma to be used as a license or diploma for such person;

For unprofessional conduct;

For knowingly submitting false or misleading information to the board in the application for a license or renewal of a license;

For knowingly submitting false or misleading information to the board or its representative regarding the professional practice of the internship or professional practice of pharmacy by any other person;

Willful violation of any provision of this chapter or any willful violation of any of the provisions of the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971 or any amendments thereto;

Willful violation of any rules or regulations promulgated by the board in accordance with this chapter or the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971;

If the person’s registration or license to practice has been refused, lapsed for cause, expired for cause, revoked for cause, or suspended for cause in this or any other jurisdiction or if the person has otherwise been disciplined by a board of pharmacy in this or any other jurisdiction;

For senility or mental impairment which impedes the pharmacist’s professional abilities or for habitual personal use of morphine, cocaine or other habit forming drugs or alcohol; or

For physical impairment which unnecessarily impedes the pharmacist’s professional abilities and for which there can be no reasonable accommodation.

If a person accused of violating subsection (a) of this section admits the violation, or the board finds the causes alleged to be true and determines that a letter of admonition or revocation or suspension of a license or registration is an inappropriate remedy, the board may assess an administrative penalty against that person of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) for each violation of this act or rule promulgated under this act, to be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the public school fund of the county in which the violation occurred. In addition to the penalty imposed under this subsection, the board may impose a license probation period upon that person, a violation of which is grounds for license revocation or suspension under subsection (a) of this section.

The board may summarily suspend the license of any person holding a pharmacist license without a hearing if the board finds probable cause to believe that there is imminent danger to the public health or safety. The board may meet by telephone to consider summarily suspending a license if a quorum of the board is not available to meet in person under exigent circumstances. Summary suspension shall occur if the board determines there is probable cause to believe that continued practice by the licensee constitutes an imminent danger to the public health or safety. Proceedings for a disciplinary hearing shall be instituted simultaneously with the summary suspension. If the board does not commence the disciplinary hearing within thirty (30) days of the suspension order, the suspension shall be automatically vacated. At the written request of the suspended licensee in order to prepare for a hearing, the thirty (30) day period may be extended and the temporary suspension continued for an additional period not to exceed thirty (30) days.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 100, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 33-311; Laws 1969, ch. 146, § 23; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-304.23; Laws 1975, ch. 194, § 1; 1989, ch. 250, § 2; 1993, ch. 30, § 2; 1995, ch. 23, § 1; 1999, ch. 101, § 2; 2003, ch. 176, § 2; 2007, ch. 211, § 1; 2017 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional provision relative to right of accused to be heard by counsel, see art. 1, § 10, Wyo. Const.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), inserted “or issue a summary suspension” and added (c).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(viii) added “or suspected for cause”, added “or if the person has otherwise been disciplined by a board of pharmacy in this or any other jurisdiction”, and made stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(i), substituted “that relates to the practice of pharmacy or to the ability to practice pharmacy” for “involving moral turpitude” following “misdemeanor.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-24-101(a).

Wyoming Controlled Substances Act. —

See §§

35-7-1001

through

35-7-1057

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statute or rule making specified conduct or condition the ground for cancelation or suspension irrespective of licensee's personal fault, 3 ALR2d 107.

Statute authorizing revocation of license upon conviction as applicable to conviction based on plea of nolo contendere or non vult, 89 ALR2d 540.

Revocation or suspension of license or permit to practice pharmacy or operate drugstore because of improper sale or distribution of narcotic or stimulant drugs, 17 ALR3d 1408.